Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.120

Certificate of advanced first aid qualification.

The secretary shall recognize a current certificate of advanced first aid qualification for those who provide proof of advanced Red Cross training or its equivalent.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 261 s 12; 1973 1st ex.s. c 208 s 12.]